Oklahoma, session 2025, SB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1527, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-1527. The State Legislature by adopting this act


intends to preempt any other regulation promulgated to control


smoking in public places and to standardize laws that governmental


Political subdivisions may adopt regulations to control or prohibit


smoking or vaping in public places or properties owned or operated


by the respective governing bodies. Cities and towns may enact and


enforce laws prohibiting and penalizing conduct under provisions of


this act, but the provisions of such laws shall be the same as


provided in this act and the enforcement provisions under such laws

Req. No. 281 Page 1


shall not the Smoking in Public Places and Indoor Workplaces Act.


Such laws may be more, but not less, stringent than those of this


act; provided, however, that cities and towns shall be authorized to


enact laws restricting smoking on properties owned or operated by


the respective governing bodies. Nothing in this section shall be


construed as to prevent county or municipal governments, at the


discretion of the respective governing bodies, from prohibiting


smoking in or on property owned or operated by the respective


governing bodies the Smoking in Public Places and Indoor Workplaces


Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-281 MSBB 1/2/2025 4:06:26 PM























Req. No. 281 Page 2